es: Estilo de herramienta de divot: Fijo; Multiusos; Retráctil; Estilo navaja/plegable; Otro
hr-HR: Stil alata za divot: Fiksno; Višenamjenski alat; Uvlačivo; Sklopivo / skočni mehanizam; Ostalo
pl: Typ narzędzia do naprawy divotów: Stały; Narzędzie wielofunkcyjne; Wysuwany; Sprężynowy / składany; Inne
fi: Divot-työkalun tyyppi: Kiinteä; Monitoimityökalu; Sisäänvedettävä; Linkkuveitsityyppinen/taitettava; Muu
lt-LT: Duobučių taisymo įrankio tipas: Fiksuotas; Daugiafunkcis įrankis; Ištraukiamas; Automatinis / atlenkiamas; Kita
hu: Gyepvágó szerszám stílusa: Fix; Multiszerszám; Visszahúzható; Rugósbicska-szerű/összecsukható; Egyéb
pt-BR: Estilo das ferramentas de reparo de gramado: Fixo; Multiferramenta; Retrátil; Estilo canivete/dobrável; Outro
pt-PT: estilo de ferramenta de recortar marcas: Fixo; Multiferramentas; Retrátil; Mola/dobrável; Outro
cs: Typ vypichovátka na golfové ferveje: Pevné; Multifunkční nástroj; Zatahovací; Vyskakovací/skládací; Ostatní
ja: ディボットツールスタイル: 固定式; マルチツール; 収納式; 飛び出し式/折りたたみ式; その他
da: Divot-værktøjsstil: Fast; Multiværktøj; Udtrækkelig; Springkniv/foldbar; Anden
el: Στυλ εργαλείου επιδιόρθωσης χλοοτάπητα: Σταθερό; Πολυεργαλείο; Αναδιπλούμενο; Αυτόματο/Αναδιπλούμενο; Άλλο
tr: Çim onarım aleti stili: Sabit; Çoklu alet; Geri çekilebilir; Sustalı/katlanabilir; Diğer
ko: 디봇 도구 스타일: 고정형; 멀티 툴; 접이식; 잭나이프/접이식; 기타
en: Divot tool style: Fixed; Multi-tool; Retractable; Switchblade/folding; Other
bg-BG: Стил на уреда за поправяне на дупки: Фиксиран; Мултитул; Прибиращ се; Сгъваем/тип нож; Друго
sk-SK: Štýl nástroja na kultiváciu trávnika: Pevná; Multifunkčný nástroj; Vysúvacia; Vystreľovacia/skladacia; Iná
it: Stile attrezzo per scavare zolle: Fisso; Strumento multiuso; Retrattile; A scatto/pieghevole; Altro
de: Stil des Divot-Werkzeugs: Fest; Multitool; Einziehbar; Springmesser/Klappbar; Sonstige
zh-TW: 球痕修復工具樣式: 固定式; 多功能工具; 伸縮式; 彈簧/折疊式; 其他
vi: Kiểu dụng cụ sửa vết lõm: Cố định; Đa năng; Có thể thu vào; Bấm/gập; Khác
zh-CN: 草皮修复工具款式: 固定式; 多功能工具; 可伸缩式; 弹簧刀式/折叠式; 其他
th: สไตล์เครื่องมือซ่อมรอยหญ้า: แบบตายตัว; เครื่องมืออเนกประสงค์; แบบยืดหดได้; แบบสปริง/พับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
nb: Divot-verktøystil: Fast; Multiverktøy; Uttrekkbar; Springkniv/sammenleggbar; Annet
nl: Divot gereedschaps stijl: Vast; Multitool; Intrekbaar; Klapmes/inklapbaar; Overig
ru: Стиль инструмента для дивотов: Фиксированный; Мультитул; Выдвижной; Складной/выкидной; Другое
sv: Divot-verktygsstil: Fast; Multiverktyg; Infällbar; Fällkniv/vikbar; Övrigt
sl-SI: Slog orodja Divot: Fiksno; Večnamensko orodje; Zložljivo; Na preklop/zložljivo; Drugo
ro-RO: Stilul uneltei Divot: Fix; Unealtă multifuncțională; Retractabil; Tip briceag/pliabil; Altele
fr: Style de relève-pitch: Fixe; Outil multifonction; Rétractable; À cran d’arrêt/pliable; Autre